zh-TW: 孕婦裝特點: 帶子可調; 透氣設計; 耐氯; 彈性腰帶; 修身剪裁; 柔韌; 輕盈; 速乾; 孕腹成長空間; 支撐罩杯; UPF 防曬; 素食友善; 其他
fi: Äitiysvaatteiden ominaisuudet: Säädettävä hihna; Hengittävä muotoilu; Klooria kestävä; Joustava vyötärönauha; Imarteleva siluetti; Joustava; Kevyt; Nopeasti kuivuva; Tilaa vatsan kasvulle; Tukevat kupit; UPF-aurinkosuoja; Vegaaniystävällinen; Muu
pt-BR: Características das roupas de maternidade: Alça ajustável; Design respirável; Resistente ao cloro; Cintura elástica; Silhueta lisonjeira; Flexível; Leve; Secagem rápida; Espaço para o crescimento da barriga; Bojos com suporte; Proteção solar FPS; Vegano; Outro
nl: Kenmerken zwangerschapskleding: Verstelbare band; Luchtig ontwerp; Chloorbestendig; Elastische tailleband; Flatterend model; Flexibel; Lichtgewicht; Sneldrogend; Ruimte voor de groei van je buik; Ondersteunende cups; Bescherming tegen de zon; Geschikt voor veganisten; Andere
nb: Mammaklærfunksjoner: Regulerbar stropp; Pustende design; Klorbestandig; Elastisk linning; Smigrende silhuett; Fleksibel; Lett; Hurtigtørkende; Rom for magevekst; Støttende skåler; UPF-solbeskyttelse; Vegansk; Annet
de: Eigenschaften von Umstandskleidung: Verstellbarer Riemen; Atmungsaktives Design; Chlorbeständig; Elastischer Bund; Schmeichelnde Silhouette; Flexibel; Leicht; Schnelltrocknend; Raum für Bauchwachstum; Unterstützende Körbchen; UV-Sonnenschutz; Geeignet für Veganer; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Značilnosti oblačil za nosečnice: Nastavljive naramnice; Dihajoča zasnova; Odporen na klor; Elastičen pas; Laskava silhueta; Prilagodljivo; Lahko; Hitro sušenje; Prostor za rast trebuha; Podporne košarice; UPF zaščita pred soncem; Veganom prijazno; Drugo
es: Características de la ropa de maternidad: Correa regulable; Diseño transpirable; Resistente al cloro; Cintura elástica; Silueta favorecedora; Flexible; Liviano; Secado rápido; Espacio para el crecimiento del vientre; Copas de apoyo; Protección solar UPF; Producto vegano; Otros
cs: Vlastnosti těhotenského oblečení: Nastavitelný popruh; Prodyšný design; Odolné vůči chlóru; Elastický pas; Lichotivá silueta; Pružná; Lehké; Rychlé schnutí; Prostor pro růst břicha; Podpůrné košíčky; Ochrana před sluncem UPF; Vhodné pro vegany; Jiné
pl: Charakterystyka odzieży ciążowej: Regulowany pasek; Oddychająca konstrukcja; Materiał odporny na chlor; Elastyczny pas; Modelująca sylwetka; Elastyczne; Lekkie; Szybkoschnący; Miejsce na wzrost brzucha; Miseczki podtrzymujące; Ochrona przeciwsłoneczna UPF; Przyjazny dla wegan; Inne
lt-LT: Drabužių nėščiosioms savybės: Reguliuojamas dirželis; Orui laidus dizainas; Atsparūs chlorui; Tamprus juosmuo; Estetiškas siluetas; Tamprūs; Lengvi; Greitai džiūstantys; Turintys vietos pilvuko augimui; Prilaikantys puodeliai; UPF apsauga nuo saulės; Tinkantys veganams; Kita
it: Funzionalità dell'abbigliamento premaman: Cinghia regolabile; Design traspirante; Resistente al cloro; Cintura elastica; Silhouette lusinghiera; Flessibile; Leggero; Asciugatura rapida; Spazio per la crescita della pancia; Coppe di sostegno; Sistema di protezione solare SPF; Per vegani; Altro
da: Funktioner for graviditetstøj: Justerbar rem; Åndbart design; Klorresistent; Elastisk linning; Flatterende silhuet; Fleksibel; Letvægts; Hurtigttørrende; Plads til mavevækst; Understøttende skåle; UPF-solbeskyttelse; Vegansk; Andet
bg-BG: Характеристики на облеклото за бременни: Регулируема каишка; Дишащ дизайн; Устойчив на хлор; Еластична талия; Прилягащ силует; Гъвкава; Олекотена; Бързо изсъхване; Място за растеж на корема; Поддържащи чашки; Слънцезащита UPF; Подходящ за вегани; Други
zh-CN: 孕妇装特点: 可调扣带; 透气设计; 抗氯气; 弹性腰带; 修身版型; 灵活式; 轻质; 速干; 宽松遮肚显瘦; 支撑性软杯; UPF 防晒; 人造革; 其他
vi: Đặc điểm quần áo bà bầu: Điều chỉnh được dây; Thiết kế thoáng khí; Kháng clo; Cạp co dãn; Tôn dáng; Mềm dẻo; Hạng nhẹ; Sấy khô nhanh; Chỗ cho bụng phình to; Cúp nâng đỡ; Chống nắng UPF; Phù hợp với người ăn chay; Khác
en: Maternity clothing features: Adjustable strap; Breathable design; Chlorine resistant; Elastic waistband; Flattering silhouette; Flexible; Lightweight; Quick drying; Room for belly growth; Supportive cups; UPF sun protection; Vegan friendly; Other
th: คุณลักษณะเสื้อผ้าสตรีมีครรภ์: สายรัดที่ปรับได้; การออกแบบที่ระบายอากาศได้ดี; ทนต่อคลอรีน; ขอบเอวยางยืด; โครงชุดแบบทำให้ดูสมส่วน; ขอบยืดหยุ่น; น้ำหนักเบา; แห้งเร็ว; ชุดขยายรับคนท้อง; ทรงยกกระชับ; ป้องกันแสงอาทิตย์ UPF; วีแกนรับประทานได้; อื่นๆ
fr: Caractéristiques du vêtement de maternité: Sangle réglable; Design respirant; Résistant au chlore; Ceinture élastique; Silhouette flatteuse; Flexible; Léger; Séchage minute; Espace pour la croissance du ventre; Bonnets de soutien; Protection solaire FPS; Convient aux végétaliens; Autre
ja: マタニティ衣類の特徴: 調節可能なストラップ; 通気性デザイン; 耐塩素性; 伸縮性のあるウエストバンド; 美しいシルエット; フレキシブル; 軽量; 急速乾燥; お腹の大きさの変化に合わせた余地; サポート力のあるカップ; UPF日焼け止め; ビーガン対応; その他
ko: 임부복 기능: 조절식 스트랩; 통기성 좋은 디자인; 내염소성; 신축성 있는 허리밴드; 매력적인 실루엣; 유연함; 경량; 빠른 건조; 배를 키울 공간; 지지 컵; UPF 자외선 차단; 비건 친화적; 기타
el: Χαρακτηριστικά ρούχων εγκυμοσύνης: Ρυθμιζόμενος ιμάντας; Σχεδιασμός που αναπνέει; Ανθεκτικό στο χλώριο; Ελαστική ζώνη; Κολακευτική σιλουέτα; Εύκαμπτο; Μικρού βάρους; Γρήγορο στέγνωμα; Χώρος για την ανάπτυξη της κοιλιάς; Υποστηρικτικά κύπελλα; UPF αντηλιακή προστασία; Χωρίς υλικά ζωικής προέλευσης; Άλλο
tr: Hamile Giyim özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir kayış; Nefes alan tasarım; Klora dayanıklı; Elastik kemer; İyi gösteren siluet; Esnek; Hafif; Çabuk kuruma; Göbek büyümesi için pay; Destekleyici kaplar; UPF güneş koruması; Vegan dostu; Diğer
ru: Характеристики одежды для беременных: Регулируемый ремешок; Дышащая конструкция; Устойчив к хлору; Эластичный пояс; Облегающий силуэт; Растягивающийся; Легкий; Быстросохнущий; Место для растущего живота; Поддерживающие чашки; Защита от солнца UPF; Подходит для веганов; Другой
sk-SK: Vlastnosti tehotenského oblečenia: Nastaviteľný popruh; Priedušný dizajn; Odolný voči chlóru; Elastický pás; Lichotivá silueta; Flexibilný; Ľahký; Rýchlo schnúci; Priestor pre rast brucha; Podporné poháre; UPF ochrana pred slnkom; Vhodné pre vegánov; Iné
hu: Kismamaruhák jellemzői: Állítható pánt; Légáteresztő anyag; Klórálló; Elasztikus derékrész; Előnyös sziluett; Rugalmas; Könnyű; Gyorsan száradó; Hely a has növekedéséhez; Alátámasztó melltartó; UPF fényvédelem; Vegán; Egyéb
hr-HR: Značajke odjeće za trudnice: Podesivi remen; Prozračan dizajn; Otporno na klor; Elastični pojas; Laskava silueta; Fleksibilno; Lagano; Brzo sušenje; Prostor za rast trbuha; Potporne košarice; UPF zaštita od sunca; Pogodno za vegane; Ostalo
sv: Detaljer för mammakläder: Justerbar rem; Andningsbar design; Klorbeständig; Elastiskt midjeband; Smickrande siluett; Flexibel; Lättvikt; Snabbtorkande; Utrymme för magtillväxt; Stödjande koppar; UPF-solskydd; Veganvänlig; Övrigt
pt-PT: Características de roupa de maternidade: Alça ajustável; Design respirável; Resistente ao cloro; Cintura elástica; Silhueta lisonjeira; Flexível; Leveza; Secagem rápida; Espaço para o crescimento da barriga; Copos de suporte; Proteção solar UPF; Adequado para veganos; Outro
ro-RO: Caracteristici îmbrăcăminte pentru gravide: Curea reglabilă; Design respirabil; Rezistent la clor; Bandă elastică în talie; Croi măgulitor; Flexibilă; Ușoară; Uscare rapidă; Spațiu pentru creșterea burticii; Cupe de susținere; Protectie solara UPF; Vegan; Altele